Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-543
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 14-101 to 14-2004:

(1) Lot means a lot as described and designated upon the recorded plat of a city of the metropolitan class, and in case there is no recorded plat of any such city, a lot as described and designated upon any generally recognized map of such city;

(2) Lands means any unsubdivided real estate in a city of the metropolitan class; and

(3) Street includes boulevards, avenues, alleys, lanes, or any form of public roadway in a city of the metropolitan class.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 31, p. 485;

C.S.1922, § 3657;

C.S.1929, § 14-534;

R.S.1943, § 14-543;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 193.
July 21, 2022
Right-of-way of railroad crossing street at an angle was subject to special assessment. Chicago & N.W. Ry. Co. v. City of Omaha, 154 Neb. 442, 48 N.W.2d 409 (1951).